Maryland, session 2026, HB0392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–1901.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Program” means the Maryland Healthy Soils Program.
(b) There is a Maryland Healthy Soils Program.
(e) (1) In each of fiscal years 2024 through [2028] 2026, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $500,000 for the Program.
(2) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $400,000
FOR THE PROGRAM.
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 392 7
(d) “Native Plant Specialist” means the University of Maryland Extension agent
hired under § 10–403 of this subtitle.
(e) “Program” means the Maryland Native Plants Program.
10–402.
(a) There is a Maryland Native Plants Program.
10–407.
(d) For fiscal year 2025 and [each fiscal year thereafter] FISCAL YEAR 2026, the
Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $150,000 for the
University of Maryland Extension to hire one extension agent as a Native Plant Specialist
and $100,000 for the Department to hire staff to administer the Program.
Article – Economic Development
5–1901.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Cannabis Business Assistance Fund.
(b) There is a Cannabis Business Assistance Fund.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Fund may be used only
for:
(i) grants or loans to small, minority–owned, or women–owned
businesses for:
1. license application assistance for participation in the
adult–use cannabis industry;
2. assistance with the operating or capital expenses of a
business participating in the adult–use cannabis industry; or
3. targeted training to support participation in the adult–use
cannabis industry;
(ii) grants to historically black colleges and universities for
cannabis–related programs and business development organizations, including incubators,
to train and assist small, minority, and women business owners and entrepreneurs seeking
to become licensed to participate in the adult–use cannabis industry; [and]

HOUSE BILL 392
(III) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, OPERATING COSTS
UP TO $5,000,000 OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY; AND
[(iii)] (IV) the administrative costs of the Fund.
(3) In order to award grants and loans in accordance with paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Department shall develop partnerships with:
(iii) the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs.
13–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Council” means the Tri–County Council for Southern Maryland.
13–611.
(b) (3) (i) The Governor shall include in the State budget for the following
fiscal year an appropriation to partially support the Council.
(ii) 1. A. For [fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year
thereafter] FISCAL YEARS 2024 THROUGH 2026, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 to the Council from the Cigarette
Restitution Fund established under § 7–317 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
B. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION OF $700,000 TO THE COUNCIL FROM THE CIGARETTE
RESTITUTION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–317 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
2. The Council shall use funds appropriated from the
Cigarette Restitution Fund for the purpose of funding the activities of the Southern
Maryland Agricultural Development Commission.
3. The appropriation required under subsubparagraph 1 of
this subparagraph shall be in addition to, and may not supplant, any funding appropriated
to the Council.
Article – Education
2–305.
(b) (1) There is a Lacrosse Opportunities Program in the Department.

HOUSE BILL 392 9
(2) The purpose of the Lacrosse Opportunities Program is to increase
opportunities for minority students to participate in lacrosse in their communities.
(g) For fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor [shall] MAY
include in the annual budget submission at least $40,000 for the Lacrosse Opportunities
Program.
7–447.1.
(p) (1) In this subsection, “Fund” means the Coordinated Community Supports
Partnership Fund.
(3) The purpose of the Fund is to support the delivery of services and
supports provided to students to meet their holistic behavioral health needs and address
other related challenges.
(9) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill the following
appropriations for the Fund:
(vi) [$100,000,000] $80,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal
year thereafter.
16–305.
(a) The formula used for the distribution of funds to the community colleges in
the State shall be known as the Senator John A. Cade Funding Formula.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(11) “State share” means the amount of money for community college
operating funds to be provided each fiscal year to a board by the State.
(c) (3) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the total State share for each
board shall be the sum of:
(i) The base costs component; and
(ii) The size factor component.
(d) (1) In each fiscal year, in order for a board to receive an increase in the
State share of support, the county share, in the aggregate, that supports the community
college or colleges shall equal or exceed the aggregate amount of operating fund
appropriations made to the board by the county or all of the counties supporting the college
in the previous fiscal year.

HOUSE BILL 392
(2) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE STATE SHARE, AS
DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, MAY NOT EXCEED AN
INCREASE OF 3% OVER THE STATE SHARE PROVIDED TO EACH COMMUNITY
COLLEGE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
16–512.
(a) In this section, “State Funds per full–time equivalent student appropriation
to the 4–year public institutions of higher education” has the meaning stated in §
17–104(a)(1) of this article.
(b) (1) The total State operating fund per full–time equivalent student
appropriated to Baltimore City Community College for each fiscal year other than fiscal
year 2013, as requested by the Governor shall be:
(xiii) In fiscal year 2022, not less than an amount equal to 66.5% of the
State’s General Fund appropriation per full–time equivalent student to the 4–year public
institutions of higher education in the State as designated by the Commission for the
purpose of administering the Joseph A. Sellinger Program under Title 17 of this article in
the same fiscal year; [and]
(xiv) In fiscal [year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2023
THROUGH 2026, not less than an amount equal to 68.5% of the State Funds per full–time
equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in
the State as designated by the Commission for the purpose of administering the Joseph A.
Sellinger Program under Title 17 of this article; AND
(XV) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
NOT LESS THAN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 67.5% OF THE STATE FUNDS PER FULL–TIME
EQUIVALENT STUDENT APPROPRIATION TO THE 4–YEAR PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE AS DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING THE JOSEPH A. SELLINGER PROGRAM UNDER TITLE
17 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the State Funds per full–time
equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in
the State for a fiscal year shall include:
(i) Noncapital appropriations from the Higher Education
Investment Fund; and
(ii) Appropriations, regardless of where they are budgeted,
designated for the general operation of 4–year public institutions of higher education in the
State, including personnel–related appropriations.
17–101.

HOUSE BILL 392 11
There is a program of State aid to private nonprofit institutions of higher education
known as the Joseph A. Sellinger Program.
17–104.
(a) (1) (i) In this subsection, “State Funds per full–time equivalent student
appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education” shall be calculated in
accordance with this paragraph using the General Fund and Higher Education Investment
Fund actual expenditures for the second previous fiscal year.
(ii) The total number of full–time equivalent students is based on
credit hour production for the second previous fiscal year.
(iii) The number of undergraduate full–time equivalent students
shall be calculated using total undergraduate credit hour production divided by 30.
(iv) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, the number of graduate full–time equivalent students shall be calculated
based on a methodology agreed to by the University System of Maryland Office, Morgan
State University, and St. Mary’s College of Maryland, in consultation with the Commission.
2. If a methodology is not agreed to on or before September
16, 2024, the Commission shall determine the methodology used to calculate the number
of graduate full–time equivalent students.
(v) The Commission shall certify the number of full–time equivalent
students for each institution on or before October 1 each year.
(2) (I) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Maryland Higher
Education Commission shall compute the amount of the annual apportionment for each
institution that qualifies under this subtitle by multiplying the number of full–time
equivalent undergraduate students enrolled at the institution during the fall semester of
the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the aid apportionment is made, as
determined by the Maryland Higher Education Commission, by an amount not less than
16.1% of the State Funds per full–time equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year
public institutions of higher education in this State.
(II) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE
ANNUAL APPORTIONMENT FOR EACH INSTITUTION THAT QUALIFIES UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE IS:
1. CAPITOL TECHNOLOGY UNIVERSITY – $914,981;
2. GOUCHER COLLEGE – $3,168,940;

HOUSE BILL 392
3. HOOD COLLEGE – $3,611,811;
4. JOHNS HOPKINS UNIVERSITY – $20,554,298;
5. LOYOLA UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND – $12,550,328;
6. MARYLAND INSTITUTE COLLEGE OF ART –
$3,745,718;
7. MCDANIEL COLLEGE – $5,945,264;
8. MOUNT ST. MARY’S UNIVERSITY – $5,476,872;
9. NOTRE DAME OF MARYLAND UNIVERSITY –
$2,037,187;
10. ST. JOHN’S COLLEGE – $1,701,410;
11. STEVENSON UNIVERSITY – $9,206,521;
12. WASHINGTON ADVENTIST UNIVERSITY – $1,367,650;
AND
13. WASHINGTON COLLEGE – $3,041,744.
(d) For purposes of this section, the State’s General Fund appropriation per
full–time equivalent student to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in the
State for a fiscal year shall include:
(1) Noncapital appropriations from the Higher Education Investment
Fund; and
(2) Appropriations, regardless of where they are budgeted, designated for
the general operation of 4–year public institutions of higher education in the State,
including personnel–related appropriations.
18–3602.
(a) There is a program of Maryland Community College Promise Scholarships in
the State that are awarded under this subtitle.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students to
attend a community college in the State.

HOUSE BILL 392 13
18–3605.
(a) Through fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include an annual appropriation
of at least $15,000,000 in the State budget for the Commission to disburse Maryland
Community College Promise Scholarships under this subtitle.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include an annual appropriation of at least $13,500,000 in the State budget for the
Commission to disburse Maryland Community College Promise Scholarships under this
subtitle.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE AN ANNUAL APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $12,500,000
IN THE STATE BUDGET FOR THE COMMISSION TO DISBURSE MARYLAND
COMMUNITY COLLEGE PROMISE SCHOLARSHIPS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
18–3701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Program” means the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Police Officers and Probation Agents.
18–3704.
(a) For fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation of at least $500,000 for the Program.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $2,000,000 for the Program.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
AT LEAST $500,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
18–3802.
(a) There is a Maryland Police Officers and Probation Agents Scholarship
Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students who
are:
(1) Attending an eligible institution and enrolled in a degree program that
would further the student’s intent to become a police officer or probation agent after
graduation; or

HOUSE BILL 392
(2) Employed as a police officer or probation agent, attending an eligible
institution, and enrolled in a degree program that would further the police officer’s or
probation officer’s career.
18–3806.
(a) For fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation of at least $500,000 to the Commission to award scholarships under this
subtitle.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $2,000,000 to the Commission
to award scholarships under this subtitle.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
AT LEAST $500,000 TO THE COMMISSION TO AWARD SCHOLARSHIPS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – Health – General
5–626.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Advance Directive Program Fund.
(b) There is an Advance Directive Program Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funding to carry out the purposes of the
Advance Directive Program established under § 5–620 of this subtitle.
(g) (1) [Money] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, MONEY in the Fund may be used only to carry out the purposes of the
Advance Directive Program established under § 5–620 of this subtitle.
(2) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $1,000,000 OF THE FUND MAY BE
USED FOR MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH QUALITY INITIATIVES IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
10–6A–03.
(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, a county may establish an assisted outpatient
treatment program in accordance with this subtitle.
(2) A county may partner with another county to establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program.

HOUSE BILL 392 15
(b) An assisted outpatient treatment program established under subsection (a) of
this section shall be approved and overseen by the county’s local behavioral health
authority or core service agency.
(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the Department shall establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program in any county that does not opt to establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program.
(2) A COUNTY IN WHICH THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED TO
ESTABLISH AN ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT PROGRAM SHALL REIMBURSE
THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, FOR 25% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, FOR 50% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, FOR 75% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS; AND
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, FOR 100% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS.
13–1015.
(a) For fiscal year 2011 and fiscal year 2012, the Governor shall include at least
$6,000,000 in the annual budget in appropriations for activities aimed at reducing tobacco
use in Maryland as recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,
including:
(1) Media campaigns aimed at reducing smoking initiation and
encouraging smokers to quit smoking;
(2) Media campaigns educating the public about the dangers of secondhand
smoke exposure;
(3) Enforcement of existing laws banning the sale or distribution of tobacco
products to individuals under the age of 21 years;
(4) Promotion and implementation of smoking cessation programs; and
(5) Implementation of school–based tobacco education programs.

HOUSE BILL 392
(b) (1) For fiscal years 2013 through 2021, the Governor shall include at least
$10,000,000 in the annual budget in appropriations for the purposes described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) For fiscal [year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2022
THROUGH 2026, the Governor shall include at least $18,250,000 in the annual budget in
appropriations for the purposes described in subsection (a) of this section.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST $17,520,000 IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET IN
APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
Article – Health Occupations
14–207.
(a) There is a Board of Physicians Fund.
(e) (1) (I) The Fund shall be used exclusively to cover the actual
documented direct and indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the
Board as provided by this title.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $2,000,000 OF THE FUND
BALANCE MAY BE USED TO SUPPORT THE PROGRAMS IN THE OFFICE OF
POPULATION HEALTH IMPROVEMENT WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
17–206.
(a) There is a State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists Fund.
(d) (1) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE Fund shall be used to cover the actual documented direct and indirect
costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the Board as provided by the
provisions of this article.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $500,000 OF THE FUND
BALANCE MAY BE USED TO SUPPORT PROGRAMS IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION OF THE DEPARTMENT.
Article – Labor and Employment
11–603.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 392 17
(3) “Program” means the Public Safety Apprenticeship Program.
(g) (1) For fiscal [year 2021 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2021
THROUGH 2025, the Governor shall include in the State budget an appropriation of at
least $750,000 for the Program to:
[(1)] (I) provide grants to eligible public safety agencies; and
[(2)] (II) cover the administrative costs of operating the Program.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE STATE BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION OF AT
LEAST $390,000 FOR THE PROGRAM TO:
(I) PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES;
AND
(II) COVER THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF OPERATING THE
PROGRAM.
11–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Program” means the Career Pathways for Health Care Workers Program.
11–1506.
(a) (1) Through fiscal year 2024, the Governor shall include in the annual
budget bill an appropriation of at least $1,000,000 for the Program.
(2) For fiscal [year] YEARS 2025 and [each fiscal year thereafter] 2026,
the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $500,000
for the Program.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF AT LEAST $350,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(b) Appropriations and expenditures made for the purpose of implementing the
Program, including the use of any funds received by a person under any component of the
Program, are subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided in § 2–1220 of
the State Government Article.
Article – Local Government

HOUSE BILL 392
16–501.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, for each fiscal year, the Comptroller shall pay to
an eligible county a grant in the amount determined under subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(2) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY TO THE FOLLOWING COUNTIES AND BALTIMORE CITY
THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS IN QUARTERLY PAYMENTS:
(I) ALLEGANY COUNTY – $7,298,505;
(II) BALTIMORE CITY – $79,051,790;
(III) CAROLINE COUNTY – $3,894,753;
(IV) DORCHESTER COUNTY – $4,159,010;
(V) GARRETT COUNTY – $2,047,408;
(VI) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY – $56,889,464;
(VII) SOMERSET COUNTY – $7,251,732;
(VIII) WASHINGTON COUNTY – $2,507,251; AND
(IX) WICOMICO COUNTY – $13,502,951.
(b) A county may not receive a grant under subsection (a) of this section if any of
the county’s income tax rates were less than 2.6%:
(1) for the taxable year that ended in the second prior fiscal year; or
(2) for any subsequent taxable year through the taxable year that ends in
the current fiscal year.
16–505.
(a) (1) For each of fiscal years 2025 [through 2028] AND 2026, the Governor
shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $500,000 to the Prince George’s
County Office of the County Executive to be used for the Prince George’s County Reentry
Employment Incentive Program under § 10–334 of the Prince George’s County Code.
(2) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $350,000 TO THE

HOUSE BILL 392 19
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OFFICE OF THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE TO BE USED FOR
THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY REENTRY EMPLOYMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM
UNDER § 10–334 OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY CODE.
(b) The funds provided under this section shall be supplemental to, and may not
supplant, funds otherwise available for reentry employment incentives in Prince George’s
County.
Article – Natural Resources
8–709.
(e) (1) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for fiscal year 2026
[and each fiscal year thereafter], the Department shall distribute at least $250,000 from
the Waterway Improvement Fund to a statewide Maryland–based historic preservation
nonprofit organization with demonstrated experience in grantmaking.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, FOR
FISCAL YEAR 2029 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
DISTRIBUTE AT LEAST $250,000 FROM THE WATERWAY IMPROVEMENT FUND TO A
STATEWIDE MARYLAND–BASED HISTORIC PRESERVATION NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION WITH DEMONSTRATED EXPERIENCE IN GRANTMAKING.
(2) A nonprofit organization shall use any funds received under this
subsection to establish, operate, and administer a maritime heritage competitive grant
program to provide grants to nonprofit organizations in the State and instrumentalities of
the State, counties, or municipalities engaged in maritime heritage preservation,
interpretation, or conservation.
(3) On or before November 30 each year, a nonprofit organization that
receives funds under this subsection shall submit a report to the Department on the
guidelines, promotion, selection, recipients, and impact of the organization’s competitive
grant program.
Article – Public Safety
1–308.
(a) There is a 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to §
1–309.1 of this subtitle, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund are to:
(i) reimburse counties for the cost of enhancing a 9–1–1 system;

HOUSE BILL 392
(ii) pay contractors in accordance with § 1–306(b)(12) of this subtitle;
and
(iii) fund the coordinator position and staff to handle the increased
duties related to wireless enhanced 9–1–1 service under § 1–305 of this subtitle, as an
administrative cost.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in addition to the purposes
described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund
include funding:
(x) costs of telecommunications cardiopulmonary resuscitation
training; [and]
(xi) costs related to the operation of the 9–8–8 suicide prevention
hotline that may be shared with 9–1–1 activities, including software interfaces and joint
training; AND
(XII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, PROGRAM OPERATIONS OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
5A–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(30) “Small commercial project” means a rehabilitation of a structure if:
(i) the qualified rehabilitation expenditures do not exceed $500,000;
and
(ii) 1. the structure is primarily used for commercial,
income–producing purposes;
2. the structure:
A. is a residential unit in a consecutive series of similar
residential units that are arranged in a row, side by side; and
B. is sold as part of a development project for exclusive
occupancy to, and occupied by, the resident;
3. the structure is a targeted project; or

HOUSE BILL 392 21
4. the structure is a condominium or cooperative project and
the rehabilitation targets only the common elements of the condominium or cooperative
project.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Reserve Fund” means the Historic Revitalization Tax Credit
Reserve Fund established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(iii) “Trust Account” means the Small Commercial Project Trust
Account established under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(2) (i) There is a Historic Revitalization Tax Credit Reserve Fund that
is a continuing, nonlapsing special fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of this article.
(4) (i) Within the Reserve Fund, there is a Small Commercial Project
Trust Account.
(ii) 1. The Trust Account is established for the issuance of tax
credit certificates for small commercial projects.
(iv) 1. For each of fiscal years 2024 through [2031] 2026, the
Governor shall include in the budget bill an appropriation to the Trust Account of at least
$2,000,000.
2. FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO THE
TRUST ACCOUNT OF AT LEAST $500,000.
7–115.
(a) On submission of the budget bill to the presiding officers of the General
Assembly, the Governor shall provide the supporting material specified in this section.
(b) The Governor shall [provide] PUBLISH ONLINE budget books that include the
information required in this section.
7–311.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Account” means the Revenue Stabilization Account.
(3) “Estimated General Fund revenues” means the estimated General
Fund revenues for a fiscal year stated in the report of the Board of Revenue Estimates

HOUSE BILL 392
submitted to the Governor under § 6–106 of this article in December preceding the fiscal
year.
(4) “Unappropriated General Fund surplus” does not include the amount
of nonwithholding income tax revenues that exceed the capped estimate determined under
§ 6–104(e) of this article.
(b) (1) The Revenue Stabilization Account is established to retain State
revenues for future needs and reduce the need for future tax increases by moderating
revenue growth.
(2) It is the goal of the State that 10% of estimated General Fund revenues
in each fiscal year be retained in the Account.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, for each fiscal year,
except fiscal [year 2026] YEARS 2026 AND 2027:
(i) if the Account balance is below 3% of the estimated General Fund
revenues for that fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the budget bill an appropriation
to the Account equal to at least $100,000,000; and
(ii) if the Account balance is at least 3% but less than 7.5% of the
estimated General Fund revenues for that fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the
budget bill an appropriation to the Account equal to at least the lesser of $50,000,000 or
whatever amount is required for the Account balance to exceed 7.5% of the estimated
General Fund revenues for that fiscal year.
(2) At the end of fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, if the
amount of nonwithholding income tax revenues exceeds the capped estimate determined
under § 6–104(e) of this article, the State Comptroller shall distribute funds as provided in
§ 7–329(c) and (d) of this subtitle.
7–317.
(a) There is a Cigarette Restitution Fund.
(g) (1) Amounts may only be expended from the Fund through appropriations
in the State budget bill as provided in this subsection.
(6) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO FISCAL YEAR 2027.
(II) For each of fiscal years 2025 through 2029, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $8,000,000 to the Maryland
Community Health Resources Commission Fund.

HOUSE BILL 392 23
(h) (1) The Fund shall include a separate account consisting of payments
received by the State as a result of litigation by participating manufacturers related to the
State’s diligent enforcement of Title 16, Subtitle 4 of the Business Regulation Article.
(2) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraph (ii)] SUBPARAGRAPHS (II)
AND (III) of this paragraph, distributions from the separate account may be used only to
supplant the General Fund appropriation to the historically black colleges and universities
required under [§ 15–126] § 15–128 of the Education Article.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 only, distributions from the separate account
may be used to support Medicaid expenses.
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, ANY AMOUNT THAT IS
DISTRIBUTED FROM THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT THAT IS IN EXCESS OF THE FIRST
$35,000,000 DISTRIBUTED MAY REMAIN IN THE ACCOUNT OR BE USED FOR
PURPOSES OTHER THAN SUPPLANTING THE GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION TO
THE HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES REQUIRED UNDER §
15–128 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(i) (1) The Fund shall include a separate account consisting of payments
received by the State from any judgment, settlement, penalty, offer of compromise, or any
other enforcement action related to the sale and marketing of electronic smoking devices.
(2) Distributions from the separate account established under paragraph
(1) of this subsection may be used, consistent with any other provision of State law, to
supplement the General Fund appropriations designated for programs under subsection (f)
of this section with the purpose of reducing the use of tobacco products by individuals under
the age of 21 years.
Article – State Government
9–20B–02.
There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Program in the Maryland Energy
Administration.
9–20B–03.
The purpose of the Program is to decrease energy demand and increase energy
supply to promote affordable, reliable, and clean energy AND TO STRENGTHEN THE
STATE’S CLIMATE MITIGATION AND CLIMATE RESILIENCY to fuel Maryland’s future
prosperity.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.

HOUSE BILL 392
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with:
(I) the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of
the Environment; AND
(II) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING TO SUPPORT
ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW OF CERTIFICATES OF PUBLIC NECESSITY ASSOCIATED
WITH POWER PLANT CONSTRUCTION REQUIRED UNDER § 3–306 OF THE NATURAL
RESOURCES ARTICLE; and
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs
account for:
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; [and]
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; [and]
(IV) PROGRAMS AND APPLICABLE INITIATIVES RELATED TO
STATE CLIMATE CHANGE MITIGATION AND CLIMATE CHANGE RESILIENCY EFFORTS;
AND
(V) NOTWITHSTANDING § 9–20B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
PROGRAMS AND APPLICABLE INITIATIVES RELATED TO RESILIENCY EFFORTS
DEFINED AND IMPLEMENTED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING THE ANNUAL REPORT BY THE OFFICE OF RESILIENCE
REQUIRED UNDER § 14–1203 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs [(2), (3), and (4)] (2) THROUGH (6)
of this subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may
be used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable
energy sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or

HOUSE BILL 392 25
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(5) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID UNDER §§
7–705(B) AND 7–705(B)(2)(I)2 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE SHALL BE MADE
AVAILABLE FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(I) $70,000,000 TO THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION
TO PROVIDE GAP FINANCING FOR AT–RISK, LARGE–SCALE CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECTS;
(II) $10,000,000 TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION TO
CONDUCT RESEARCH INTO GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES AND ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(III) $5,000,000 TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION FOR
GRANTS TO UTILITY COMPANIES TO CONSTRUCT OR MODIFY TRANSMISSION
FACILITIES THAT INCORPORATE GRID–ENHANCING AND ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) $10,000,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
TO ESTABLISH A PROCESS, ESTABLISH A MODEL LEASING FRAMEWORK, AND CREATE
SAFETY GUIDELINES FOR RIGHT–OF–WAY FOR TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE;
(V) $25,000,000 TO THE DEDICATED PURPOSE ACCOUNT FOR
RESOURCE PLANNING RELATED TO IMPLEMENTATION OF CHAPTER 19 OF THE ACTS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE 2025 SPECIAL SESSION; AND
(VI) $42,000,000 TO THE DEDICATED PURPOSE ACCOUNT TO BE
MADE AVAILABLE FOR HIGHER EDUCATION RESEARCH GRANTS.
(6) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID
UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AND DEPOSITED INTO THE
FUND MAY BE USED FOR GRANTS OR LOANS TO SUPPORT THE CREATION OF NEW
TIER 1 RENEWABLE ENERGY SOURCES IN THE STATE.
21–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Corps participant” means an individual who participates in the Program.
(d) “Department” means the Department of Service and Civic Innovation.

HOUSE BILL 392
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Corps Program.
21–205.
(a) (1) There is a Young Adult Service Year Option Pathway in the Program.
(c) (1) The Department shall set targets for participation in the YA Pathway
under this section, including:
(i) 200 corps participants in the first year of implementation;
(ii) 750 corps participants in the third year of implementation;
(iii) [1,500] 1,100 corps participants in the fourth year of
implementation; [and]
(iv) [2,000] 1,550 corps participants in the fifth year of
implementation; AND
(V) 2,000 CORPS PARTICIPANTS IN THE SIXTH YEAR OF
IMPLEMENTATION.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
21–304.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) With respect to local employees, “aggregate annual earnable
compensation” means the total annual earnable compensation payable by a local employer
to all of its local employees, calculated as of June 30 of the second prior fiscal year before
the fiscal year for which the calculation is made under this section, adjusted by any
actuarial assumed salary increases that were used in the actuarial valuation prepared
under § 21–125(b) of this title for the immediate prior fiscal year.
(3) “Local employee” means a member of the Teachers’ Retirement System
or the Teachers’ Pension System who is an employee of a day school in the State under the
authority and supervision of a county board of education or the Baltimore City Board of
School Commissioners, employed as:
(i) a clerk;
(ii) a helping teacher;
(iii) a principal;

HOUSE BILL 392 27
(iv) a superintendent;
(v) a supervisor; or
(vi) a teacher.
(4) “Local employer” means a county board of education or the Baltimore
City Board of School Commissioners.
(5) “State member” does not include a member on whose behalf a
participating governmental unit is required to make an employer contribution under §
21–305 or § 21–306 of this subtitle.
(6) “Total employer contribution for local employees” means that portion of
the employer contribution calculated under subsection (b) of this section that is attributable
to all local employees.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection, each fiscal year, on
behalf of the State members of each State system, the State shall pay to the appropriate
accumulation fund an amount equal to or greater than the sum of the amount, if any,
required to be included in the budget bill under § 3–501(c)(2)(ii) of this article and the
product of multiplying:
(i) the aggregate annual earnable compensation of the State
members of that State system; and
(ii) the sum of the normal contribution rate and the accrued liability
contribution rate for State members of that State system, as determined under this section.
(4) (i) Subject to § 21–309.1 of this subtitle, beginning on July 1, 2012,
and each fiscal year thereafter, each local employer shall pay to the appropriate
accumulation fund an amount equal to the local share of the total employer contribution
for local employees as provided in this paragraph.
(iii) Beginning in fiscal year 2017, each local employer shall pay to
the Board of Trustees its local share equal to the normal contribution rate for the Teachers’
Retirement System and the Teachers’ Pension System multiplied by the aggregate annual
earnable compensation of the local employees of that local employer.
(5) Except as provided in paragraph (6) of this subsection, the difference
between the total employer contribution for local employees and the local share of the total
employer contribution for all local employees shall be the obligation of the State.
(6) (i) Subject to § 21–309.2 of this subtitle and as provided under
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, beginning in fiscal year [2026] 2027, each county
government shall pay to the Board of Trustees the following amounts:

HOUSE BILL 392
County
Government
Allegany ...................................... [754,195] 1,139,988
Anne Arundel.............................. [9,738,875] 13,344,016
Baltimore City ............................ [8,802,114] 12,041,167
Baltimore .................................... [10,352,112] 15,122,563
Calvert ........................................ [1,647,480] 2,284,705
Caroline ....................................... [561,645] 785,750
Carroll ......................................... [2,624,055] 3,661,920
Cecil............................................. [1,327,122] 1,963,691
Charles ........................................ [2,786,366] 3,900,924
Dorchester ................................... [590,506] 794,625
Frederick ..................................... [5,925,608] 7,899,429
Garrett ........................................ [269,208] 428,865
Harford ........................................ [3,685,077] 5,297,751
Howard ........................................ [6,830,167] 9,696,329
Kent ............................................. [165,489] 255,179
Montgomery ................................ [20,861,475] 28,754,528
Prince George’s ........................... [13,000,062] 18,675,337
Queen Anne’s .............................. [691,279] 973,835
St. Mary’s .................................... [1,562,014] 2,205,319
Somerset ..................................... [314,066] 442,575
Talbot .......................................... [452,957] 651,179
Washington ................................. [2,397,889] 3,279,909
Wicomico ..................................... [1,704,888] 2,379,362
Worcester .................................... [699,872] 1,049,543
(ii) 1. For fiscal year 2026, each county government shall pay to
the Board of Trustees on or before January 1, 2026, the amount required under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, each county government
shall pay to the Board of Trustees on or before each September 1 the amount required under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) Each fiscal year, the amounts paid under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall reduce the obligations of the State with respect to the Teachers’ Pension
System and the Teachers’ Retirement System by the same amounts.
Article – Tax – General
2–606.

HOUSE BILL 392 29
(b) (1) In June of each year, from current collections, the Comptroller shall
reserve an amount of unallocated revenue that the Comptroller estimates will be claimed
on returns and refunded to taxpayers within 3 years of the date the income tax return was
due to be filed, and distribute to each county, municipal corporation, and special taxing
district a pro rata share of the balance of the unallocated individual income tax revenue.
(2) The Comptroller shall adjust the amount distributed under paragraph
(1) of this subsection to a county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district to allow
for the proportionate part of tax claim payments for a prior calendar year made after a
distribution is made to the county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district for that
year.
(i) (1) On or before [July 31, 2025] JUNE 1, 2025, the Comptroller shall
distribute $37,300,000 from the Local Reserve Account established to comply with this
section to the [Division of Paid Leave within the Maryland Department of Labor]
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(2) The Maryland Department of Labor shall reimburse the Local Reserve
Account $37,300,000 within 2 years after contributions into the Department’s Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund begin.
Article – Tax – Property
13–209.
(a) (1) Before any other distribution under this section, in any fiscal year that
bonds secured by a pledge of the State transfer tax are outstanding, the revenue from the
transfer tax shall be used to pay, as and when due, the principal of and interest on the
bonds.
(2) The Department shall deduct the cost of administering the transfer tax
from the taxes collected under this title and credit those revenues to the fund established
under § 1–203.3 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, after deducting
the revenues required under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the revenue from
transfer tax is payable to the Comptroller for deposit in a special fund.
(4) In any fiscal year in which transfer tax revenue is used to pay debt
service on outstanding bonds under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the distribution of
revenues in the special fund under this section and as specified in § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the
Natural Resources Article, for State land acquisition, or to the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund to the extent any debt service is attributable to that Fund, shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the debt service for the fiscal year.
(b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002 and for subsequent fiscal years, up
to 3% of the revenues in the special fund may be appropriated in the State budget for

HOUSE BILL 392
salaries and related expenses in the Departments of General Services and Natural
Resources and in the Department of Planning necessary to administer Title 5, Subtitle 9 of
the Natural Resources Article (Program Open Space).
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, of the balance of the revenue in
the special fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section:
(i) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, $47,268,585 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section;
(ii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, $102,833,869 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget;
(iii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, $147,374,444 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State, and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget; and
(iv) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, $68,223,132 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for the fiscal years beginning
July 1, 2006 and each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special fund,
not required under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated as provided in subsection
(d) of this section.
(3) (i) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for fiscal years 2026
through 2029, of the balance of the revenue in the special fund not required under
subsection (b) of this section, $25,000,000 shall be allocated to the General Fund of the
State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided in PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND subsection (d) of this section.
(ii) For each of fiscal years 2026 through 2029, the allocation
required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall reduce the amount allocated for
Program Open Space land acquisition purposes identified in subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this
section and § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the Natural Resources Article, the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund identified in subsection (d)(2) of this section, and the Rural Legacy
Program identified in subsection (d)(3) of this section and § 5–903(a)(2)(iii) of the Natural
Resources Article by an amount that is proportional to the amount of revenue each program
is estimated to receive for the fiscal year.
(4) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE GENERAL FUND ALLOCATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, OF THE BALANCE OF THE REVENUE IN THE

HOUSE BILL 392 31
SPECIAL FUND NOT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
$71,743,156 SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE AND THE
REMAINDER SHALL BE ALLOCATED AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL REDUCE THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED FOR THE FOLLOWING
PROGRAMS AND FUNDS:
1. PROGRAM OPEN SPACE (LOCAL) FUNDS IDENTIFIED
IN §§ 5–903(A)(2)(II)2E AND (B)(1) AND 5–905(B)(7) OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE BY $49,586,156;
2. RURAL LEGACY PROGRAM FUNDS IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION AND § 9–503(A)(2)(III) OF THE NATURAL
RESOURCES ARTICLE BY $13,400,000; AND
3. FUNDS FOR THE NATURAL RESOURCES
DEVELOPMENT FUND IDENTIFIED FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN § 5–903(G)(1)
OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(III) THE ALLOCATIONS REDUCED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE REPLACED WITH GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS.
(d) Subject to subsections (d–1) and (e) of this section, for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2002 and for each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special
fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section and not allocated to the General Fund
under subsection (c)(1) [and], (3), AND (4) of this section shall be allocated in the State
budget as follows:
(1) (i) 75.15% for the purposes specified in Title 5, Subtitle 9 of the
Natural Resources Article (Program Open Space); and
(ii) an additional 1% for Program Open Space, for land acquisition
purposes as specified in § 5–903(a)(2) of the Natural Resources Article;
(2) 17.05% for the Agricultural Land Preservation Fund established under
§ 2–505 of the Agriculture Article;
(3) 5% for the Rural Legacy Program established under § 5–9A–01 of the
Natural Resources Article; and
(4) 1.8% for the Heritage Conservation Fund established under § 5–1501
of the Natural Resources Article.

HOUSE BILL 392
(e) The sums allocated in subsection (d) of this section may not revert to the
General Fund of the State.
(g) (3) (i) 1. For fiscal year 2023, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation in the amount of $2,500,000 to the
Maryland Agricultural and Resource–Based Industry Development Corporation for the
Next Generation Farmland Acquisition Program authorized under § 10–523(a)(3)(ii) of the
Economic Development Article.
2. For fiscal year 2025 only, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation in the amount of $2,735,000 to the
Maryland Agricultural and Resource–Based Industry Development Corporation
established under Title 10, Subtitle 5 of the Economic Development Article to be used as
follows:
A. $2,300,000 to support the Corporation’s rural business
loan programs and small matching grant programs; and
B. $435,000 for grants and near–equity investments to:
I. support the creation or expansion of agricultural product
aggregation and storage sites; and
II. facilitate participation in the Certified Local Farm and
Fish Program.
3. A. For each of fiscal years 2024, 2025, AND 2026, [and
2027,] the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation
of $500,000 to the Urban Agriculture Water and Power Infrastructure Grant Fund
established under § 2–2103 of the Agriculture Article.
B. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL A GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION OF
$400,000 TO THE URBAN AGRICULTURE WATER AND POWER INFRASTRUCTURE
GRANT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–2103 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(ii) The appropriations required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph:
1. are not subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c),
and (f) of this section;
2. shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this
section and § 5–903 of the Natural Resources Article; and

HOUSE BILL 392 33
3. shall be reduced by the amount of any appropriation from
the General Fund to the special fund that:
A. exceeds the required appropriation under this paragraph;
and
B. is identified as an appropriation for reimbursement under
this paragraph.
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if an
appropriation or a transfer from the special fund to the General Fund occurs after the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2018, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bills for each
of the 3 successive fiscal years following the fiscal year in which a transfer is made a
General Fund appropriation to the special fund equal to one–third of the cumulative
amount of the appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the
applicable fiscal year.
(2) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) represents reimbursement for the cumulative amount of any
appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal
year;
(ii) is not subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c), and (f)
of this section;
(iii) shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this section and
§ 5–903 of the Natural Resources Article;
(iv) shall be made until the cumulative total appropriated under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is equal to the cumulative amount of any appropriation or
transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal year; and
(v) shall be reduced by the amount of any appropriation from the
General Fund to the special fund that:
1. exceeds the required appropriation under this subsection;
and
2. is identified as an appropriation for reimbursement under
this subsection.
(3) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection does
not apply to transfers from the special fund to the General Fund that occur in fiscal years
2026 through 2029.
Article – Transportation

HOUSE BILL 392
13–955.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Emergency Medical System
Operations Fund.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the money in the Fund
shall be used solely for:
(1) Medically oriented functions of the Department of State Police, Special
Operations Bureau, Aviation Division;
(2) The Maryland Institute for Emergency Medical Services Systems;
(3) The R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center at the University of
Maryland Medical System;
(4) The Maryland Fire and Rescue Institute;
(5) The provision of grants under the Senator William H. Amoss Fire,
Rescue, and Ambulance Fund in accordance with the provisions of Title 8, Subtitle 1 of the
Public Safety Article; and
(6) The Volunteer Company Assistance Fund in accordance with the
provisions of Title 8, Subtitle 2 of the Public Safety Article.
(f) For fiscal years 2025 [and 2026] THROUGH 2029, the money in the Fund may
be used to support general operations of the Department of State Police, Special Operations
Bureau, Aviation Command.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–414.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund.
(3) “Program” means the Driver Education in Public High Schools Grant
Program.
(b) There is a Driver Education in Public High Schools Grant Program in the
Department.

HOUSE BILL 392 35
(f) (1) There is a Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund.
(4) The Fund consists of[:
(i) Money received by the Fund from fines for vehicle security lapses
under § 17–106 of the Transportation Article; and
(ii) Any other] money from any [other] source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(5) The Fund may be used only for:
(i) Providing grants under the Program; and
(ii) Administrative costs of the Program.
Article – Natural Resources
5–903.
(a) (1) (i) Of the funds distributed to Program Open Space under § 13–209
of the Tax – Property Article, up to $3,000,000 may be transferred by an appropriation in
the State budget, or by an amendment to the State budget under Title 7, Subtitle 2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article, to the Maryland Heritage Areas Authority
Financing Fund established under Title 13, Subtitle 11 of the Financial Institutions Article
to be used for the purposes provided in that subtitle.
(ii) Of the amount transferred under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, up to $300,000 may be distributed to the Maryland Historical Trust within the
Department of Planning to be awarded as noncapital historic preservation grants.
(2) (i) 1. Of the remaining funds not appropriated under paragraph
(1)(i) of this subsection:
A. One half of the funds shall be used for recreation and open
space purposes by the Department and the Historic St. Mary’s City Commission; [and]
B. 20% of the funds or $21,000,000, whichever is greater,
shall be appropriated to the Forest and Park Service in the Department to operate State
forests and parks; AND
C. 0.2% OF THE FUNDS OR $200,000, WHICHEVER IS
GREATER, SHALL BE APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING TO
OPERATE AND MAINTAIN THE JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM.

HOUSE BILL 392
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any funds the
General Assembly appropriates to the State under this subsection shall be used only for
land acquisition projects.
(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or the allocation
formulas in § 13–209 of the Tax – Property Article and subject to paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the Governor may transfer to the Department funds from the Program Open
Space State land acquisition balance if:
(i) The balance is more than $80,000,000 at the end of a given fiscal
year; and
(ii) The Department’s existing special fund sources are insufficient
to cover existing salaries for permanent, classified positions responsible for operating and
maintaining lands administered and managed by the Department.
(2) After a fund transfer under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
remaining balance must be at least $80,000,000.
(3) (i) The Department may use any amount of the transferred funds
as a one–time fiscal year expenditure for:
1. Operation and maintenance of lands administered and
managed by the Department;
2. Administrative expenses related to land acquired by the
Department under Program Open Space; or
3. Law enforcement activities, services, salaries, and related
expenses of the Natural Resources Police.
(ii) The Department may transfer any amount of the transferred
funds to the Forest or Park Reserve Fund established under § 5–212 of this title.
(4) Any fund transfer made under this subsection supplements rather than
supplants any other funding for operation, maintenance, and administration of lands
administered and managed by the Department regardless of the source of the other
funding.
(5) FOR PURPOSES OF THE FUND TRANSFER ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BALANCE OF THE HERITAGE CONSERVATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1501 OF THIS TITLE AND ANY OTHER FUNDS
APPROPRIATED TO PROGRAM OPEN SPACE (STATESIDE) SHALL BE INCLUDED AS
PART OF THE PROGRAM OPEN SPACE STATE LAND ACQUISITION BALANCE.
Article – Transportation

HOUSE BILL 392 37
17–106.
(a) If the required security for any vehicle lapses at any time, the registration of
that vehicle:
(1) Is suspended automatically as of the date of the lapse effective not later
than 60 days after notification to the Administration that the lapse has occurred; and
(2) Remains suspended until:
(i) The required security is replaced and the vehicle owner submits
evidence of replaced security on a form as prescribed by the Administration and certified
by an insurer or insurance producer; and
(ii) Any uninsured motorist penalty fee assessed is paid to the
Administration.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each insurer or
other provider of required security immediately shall notify the Administration
electronically of those terminations or other lapses that are final.
(2) Each insurer or other provider of required security for a vehicle
registered as a Class B (for hire) vehicle under Title 13 of this article shall notify the
Administration within 45 days after a termination or other lapse that is final and occurs
anytime after the required security is issued or provided.
(c) On receipt of a notice under subsection (b) of this section, the Administration
shall:
(1) Make a reasonable effort to notify the owner of the vehicle that his
registration has been suspended; and
(2) Provide electronically the information contained in the notice of the
suspension to the Uninsured Division of the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund.
(d) (1) Within 48 hours after an owner is notified by the Administration of the
suspension of registration, the owner shall surrender all evidences of that registration to
the Administration.
(2) If the owner fails to surrender the evidences of registration within the
48–hour period, the Administration:
(i) Shall attempt to recover from the owner the evidences of
registration; and
(ii) May suspend his license to drive until he returns to the Motor
Vehicle Administration the evidences of registration.

HOUSE BILL 392
(3) The Administration may enter into contracts with private parties to
procure the services of independent agents to assist in the recovery of the evidences of
registration as authorized in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(e) (1) (i) 1. Except as provided in subparagraphs (iv) and (v) of this
paragraph, in addition to any other penalty provided for in the Maryland Vehicle Law, if
the required security for a vehicle terminates or otherwise lapses during its registration
year, the Administration may assess the owner of the vehicle with a penalty of $200 for
each vehicle without the required security for a period of 1 to 30 days.
2. If a fine is assessed, beginning on the 31st day the fine
shall increase by a rate of $7 for each day.
(ii) Each period during which the required security for a vehicle
terminates or otherwise lapses shall constitute a separate violation.
(iii) The penalty imposed under this subsection may not exceed
$3,500 for each violation in a 12–month period.
(iv) The Administration may not assess a penalty under this
subsection if:
1. The registration plates of the vehicle are returned to the
Administration within 10 days after the termination or lapse of the required security, as
shown by the records of the Administration; and
2. A. The certificate of title for the vehicle has been
transferred to a new owner;
B. The registered owner has moved out–of–state and the
registration plates are returned by mail;
C. A salvage certificate has been issued for the vehicle; or
D. A licensed dealer has taken possession of the vehicle with
an obligation to return the registration plates.
(v) Before the Administration may assess a penalty under this
subsection, the Administration shall first verify that the registration plates for the vehicle
were not returned to the Administration within 10 days after the termination or lapse of
the required security.
(2) (i) Except as provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, a
penalty assessed under this subsection shall be paid as follows:

HOUSE BILL 392 39
1. 70% to be allocated as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph; and
2. 30% to the Administration, which may be used by the
Administration, subject to subsection (f) of this section, to provide funding for contracts
with independent agents to assist in the recovery of evidences of registration as authorized
in subsection (d)(3) of this section.
(ii) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2014, the
percentage of the penalties specified under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be
allocated among the Safe Schools Fund, the Vehicle Theft Prevention Fund, the Maryland
Automobile Insurance Fund, [the Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund,] the
State–Aided Institutions Field Trip Fund, and the General Fund as follows:
1. $600,000 to the Safe Schools Fund;
2. $2,000,000 to the Vehicle Theft Prevention Fund;
3. The amounts specified under subparagraph (iii) of this
paragraph to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund;
4. [$2,000,000 to the Driver Education in Public High
Schools Fund;
5.] $600,000 to the State–Aided Institutions Field Trip Fund;
and
[6.] 5. The balance to the General Fund.
(iii) 1. Except for fiscal year 2024 and except as provided under
subsubparagraph 3 of this subparagraph, the amount distributed to the Maryland
Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall equal the
amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund in the prior fiscal year
under the provisions of this paragraph adjusted by the change for the calendar year
preceding the fiscal year in the Consumer Price Index – All Urban Consumers – Medical
Care as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
2. For fiscal year 2024, the amount distributed to the
Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall
equal the amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund in the prior
fiscal year under the provisions of this paragraph adjusted by the change for the calendar
year preceding the fiscal year in the Consumer Price Index – All Urban Consumers –
Medical Care as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics plus an
additional $2,000,000.
3. For fiscal year 2025, the amount distributed to the
Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall

HOUSE BILL 392
equal the amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund calculated in
accordance with subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph:
A. Plus an additional $3,000,000 dedicated to the exclusive
use of the Uninsured Division, which shall become part of the base amount used to calculate
the amount distributed under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph in subsequent fiscal
years; but
B. Excluding the $2,000,000 distributed to the Fund in fiscal
year 2024.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–210.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Depreciation” includes any deduction allowed under § 179 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(3) “Heavy duty SUV” means a 4–wheeled vehicle that:
(i) is manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and
highways;
(ii) is rated at more than 6,000 but not more than 14,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight; and
(iii) would be a passenger automobile as defined in § 280F of the
Internal Revenue Code if it were rated at 6,000 pounds gross vehicle weight or less.
(4) (i) “Manufacturing entity” means a person conducting or operating
a trade or business that is primarily engaged in activities that, in accordance with the
North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS), United States Manual, United
States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 Edition, would be included in Sector 31, 32,
or 33.
(ii) “Manufacturing entity” does not include a refiner, as defined in
§ 10–101 of the Business Regulation Article.
(b) In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–204 through 10–210 of this
subtitle, to determine Maryland adjusted gross income of an individual:

HOUSE BILL 392 41
(1) (i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, an amount is added to
or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of the
depreciation deduction provided under § 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and the
adjusted basis of property without regard to the additional allowance under § 168(k) of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
[(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property placed in service
by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;]
(II) FOR A MANUFACTURING ENTITY, AN AMOUNT IS ADDED TO
OR SUBTRACTED FROM FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME TO REFLECT THE
DETERMINATION OF THE DEPRECIATION DEDUCTION PROVIDED UNDER § 167(A) OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AND THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF PROPERTY BY
LIMITING THE ADDITIONAL ALLOWANCE UNDER § 168(K) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE TO 20% OF THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF THE QUALIFIED PROPERTY;
(2) AN AMOUNT IS ADDED TO OR SUBTRACTED FROM FEDERAL
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME TO REFLECT THE DETERMINATION OF THE
DEPRECIATION DEDUCTION PROVIDED UNDER § 167(A) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE AND THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF PROPERTY WITHOUT REGARD TO THE
ADDITIONAL ALLOWANCE UNDER § 168(N) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(3) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to determine the net operating loss deduction allowed under § 172 of the Internal Revenue
Code without regard to an election under § 172(b)(1)(H) of the Internal Revenue Code for a
carryback period of up to 5 years;
[(3)] (4) (i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, an amount is
added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of
the maximum aggregate costs that the taxpayer may treat as an expense under § 179 of
the Internal Revenue Code for any taxable year without regard to any changes made to
that section after December 31, 2002:
1. increasing above $25,000 the dollar limitation set forth in
§ 179(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
2. increasing above $200,000 the phase–out threshold set
forth in § 179(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property that is placed in
service by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;
[(4)] (5) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross
income to reflect the recognition of income from discharge of indebtedness and the
allowance of any deduction with respect to original issue discount without regard to § 108(i)
of the Internal Revenue Code; and

HOUSE BILL 392
[(5)] (6) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross
income to reflect the determination of the depreciation deduction with respect to any heavy
duty SUV as if the heavy duty SUV were subject to the limitations of § 280F of the Internal
Revenue Code in the same manner as it would be if the vehicle were rated at 6,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight or less.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 275 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health [shall] MAY apply to the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services
Administration at the Center for Mental Health Services for inclusion in the state certified
community behavioral health clinic demonstration program for fiscal year [2026] 2029,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the unexpended fiscal year
2018 special fund appropriation of $980,000 for outdoor recreation land loan – capital
appropriation (K00A05.10) within the Department of Natural Resources allocated to the
College of Southern Maryland may be repurposed for State land acquisition under Program
Open Space.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the General Fund
the following:
(1) $259,000,000 from the Renewable Portfolio Standard/ACP Account of
the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the
State Government Article;
(2) $187,609,007 from the Fiscal Responsibility Fund established under §
7–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(3) $33,000,000 from the Administration Account of the Maryland
Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05;
(4) $10,000,000 from the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program
Fund for Nurses and Nursing Support Staff established under § 24–1902 of the Health –
General Article; and
(5) $2,000,000 from the Performance Incentive Grant Fund established
under § 9–3209 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the General Fund

HOUSE BILL 392 43
$1,038,910 from the Dedicated Purpose Account established under § 7–310 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article for the following purposes:
(1) $355,760 for domestic violence centers;
(2) $201,292 for assisted living centers;
(3) $152,732 for the State Police Gun Center;
(4) $101,537 for police departments to coordinate task forces that cross
jurisdictional boundaries;
(5) $100,001 for the Center for Neuroscience of Social Justice;
(6) $75,988 for violence prevention and interruption organizations; and
(7) $51,600 for the Greater Baltimore Regional Integrated Crisis System.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2027, the Governor may transfer to the General Fund
$6,700,000 from the Maternal and Child Health Population Health Improvement Fund
established under § 19–210 of the Health – General Article.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2027, the Governor may transfer to the General Fund
the following, with the funds for related projects to be replaced with General Obligation
Bonds:
(1) $70,000,000 from the Bay Restoration Fund established under §
9–1605.2 of the Environment Article;
(2) $13,068,000 from the Waterway Improvement Fund established under
§ 8–707 of the Natural Resources Article; and
(3) $188,844 from the Program Open Space Local Funds that reverted to
and are held in a special account by the Department of Natural Resources under §
5–905(b)(7) of the Natural Resources Article.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the fiscal year 2026 General
Fund appropriation of $3,000,000 for Facility Operations Administration and Support
(V00E01.02) within the Department of Juvenile Services restricted for the purpose of
reopening the Alfred D. Noyes Children’s Center as an adolescent drug treatment center
may be instead used to provide drug treatment services at other child–serving facilities and
to reopen the Alfred D. Noyes Children’s Center as a facility for children.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, no amounts may be expended in fiscal year 2027 to pay increases over the

HOUSE BILL 392
rates in effect on January 21, 2026, for providers of nonpublic placements under § 8–406 of
the Education Article.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, no amounts may be expended in fiscal year 2027 to pay increases over the
rates in effect on January 21, 2026, for providers with rates set by the Interagency Rates
Committee under § 8–417 of the Education Article.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Interagency Commission on School Construction may reallocate
federal funding awarded from fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for heating, ventilation, and
air–conditioning upgrades for public school buildings to ensure compliance with the
provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 15 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.